Hawaii statutes.
§651-43 Advertisement for sale. The
officer shall, after levy, advertise for sale the property levied upon, whether
real or personal, for thirty days, or for such time as the court shall order,
by posting a written or printed notice in three conspicuous places within the
district where the property is situated, and if on the island of Oahu, by
advertisement thereof at least three times in one or more newspapers published
in Honolulu. [CC 1859, §1023; am L 1886, c 58, §1; RL 1925, §2447; RL 1935,
§4146; RL 1945, §10173; RL 1955, §233-42; HRS §651-43]

Case Notes

Effect of sale upon defective notice. 20 H. 678 (1911).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next